Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 25 Physical Therapists
§ 33-25-111.
Discipline; denial or suspension of license or certificate; grounds.

The board may revoke, suspend, restrict, condition, reprimand, refuse to issue or refuse to renew the license or certification of any individual who:

Practices physical therapy or acts as a physical therapist assistant in violation of the provisions of this act;

Has practiced or attempts to practice fraud or deceit in:

Procuring or attempting to procure a license or certificate;

Filing or reporting any health care information, including but not limited to client documentation, agency records or other essential health documents;

Signing any report or record as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant;

Representing authority to practice physical therapy;

Submitting any information or record to the board.

Commits negligence or incompetence in the practice of physical therapy or engages in any act inconsistent with uniform and reasonable standards of physical therapy practice as defined by board rules and regulations, whether with or without injury to a patient;

Has been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor that relates adversely to the practice of physical therapy or the ability to practice physical therapy, in the courts of this state, another jurisdiction or another country. As used in this paragraph, conviction includes a finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt, a plea of nolo contendere or a plea agreement where the defendant has pled guilty yet not admitted to all the facts that comprise the crime;

Unlawfully uses or possesses controlled substances, or excessively indulges in the use of alcoholic beverages;

Has treated or has undertaken to treat human ailments otherwise than by physical therapy as defined in this act;

Has had his license to practice physical therapy or certification to act as a physical therapist assistant refused, revoked or suspended or has had other disciplinary action taken in another jurisdiction or country;

Has negligently failed to refer a patient whose condition is beyond the training or ability of the physical therapist to another professional qualified to diagnose or care for the condition;

Has engaged in any conduct or practice contrary to recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession where the conduct or practice might constitute a danger to the health, safety or welfare of the patient or the public;

Engages directly or indirectly in the division, transferring, assigning, rebating, or refunding of fees received for professional services or profits by means of a credit or other valuable consideration as an unearned commission, discount or gratuity with any person who has referred a patient, or with any relative or business associate of the referring person. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as prohibiting the members of any regularly and properly organized business entity comprised of or including physical therapists from making any division of their total fees among themselves as they determine by contract necessary;

Has been judged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Fails to refer a patient or client or post information as required by W.S. 33-25-102(c) and (e);

Has knowingly engaged in an act which the license or certificate holder knew was beyond the scope of the individual’s license or certificate or performed acts without sufficient education, knowledge or ability to competently apply physical therapy principles and skills;

Is unfit or incompetent to practice physical therapy by reason of negligence, habits or other causes including but not limited to inability to exercise reasonable skill and care for patients by reasons of physical disability, mental disability or the use of drugs, narcotics, alcohol, chemicals or other substance that affects mental faculties;

Knowingly fails to report to the board any violation of this act or rules and regulations of the board;

Violates any provisions of this act, rules and regulations of the board or lawfully issued disciplinary order of the board;

Has engaged or attempted to engage in conduct that subverts or undermines the integrity of the examination or the examination process including but not limited to utilizing recalled or memorized examination questions, failing to comply with all test center security procedures, communicating with other examinees during the examination or copying or sharing examination questions or portions of questions;

Has failed to maintain adequate patient records that include identification of the patient, evaluation of objective findings, a diagnosis, a plan of care, a treatment record and a discharge plan;

Has failed to properly supervise physical therapist assistants or physical therapy aides;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 80, § 3.

Has interfered with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by:

Failing to provide the board with requested information or documents, including patient medical records;

Misrepresentation of material facts;

Threatening, harassing or intimidating any patient, witness or board member during the course of an investigation.

Has failed to maintain patient confidentiality, including confidentiality of records relating to consultation by telecommunication, without documented patient authorization or as otherwise required by law.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.11; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2003, ch. 111, § 1; 2009, ch. 134, § 2; 2018 ch. 80, § 3, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “certification” for “registration” in (a) and (a)(vii); in (a), deleted “limit the scope of practice allowed by the license or registration, or condition the retention of a license or registration upon successful completion of any reasonable requirement, or may refuse to license or register any applicant or may refuse to renew the license or registration of any person or may suspend or” following “the board may” and added “suspend, restrict, condition, reprimand, refuse to issue or refuse to renew” preceding “the license”; rewrote (a)(ii), which read: “Attempts to or obtains licensure or registration by fraud or misrepresentations”; added (a)(ii)(A) through (a)(ii)(E); added the provision beginning with “or engages” in (a)(iii); in (a)(iv), in the first sentence, added “or a misdemeanor that relates adversely to the practice of physical therapy or the ability to practice physical therapy” following “a felony” and substituted “another jurisdiction or another country” for “or any other state, territory or country”, and in the second sentence, added the language beginning with “or a plea agreement”; in (a)(v), substituted “Unlawfully uses or possesses” for “Habitually indulges in the use of” and substituted “alcoholic beverages” for “alcoholic liquors or malt beverages”; substituted “in another jurisdiction” for “by the proper authorities of another state, territory” in (a)(vii); substituted “Has engaged in” for “Has been guilty of” in (a)(ix); substituted “33-25-102(e)” for “33-25-102(c) and (e)” in (a)(xii); and added (a)(xiii) through (a)(xxii).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (a)(xx), which read: “Has engaged in sexual misconduct as defined by the rules and regulations of the board.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (a)(xii) substituted "33-25-102(c) and (e);" for "33-25-102(e)".

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).

§ 33-25-112.
Hearing and appeal procedures.

All disciplinary actions, denials of applications and hearings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Except as provided by W.S. 33-25-111(b), all board decisions concerning revocation or suspension of a license or registration shall require an affirmative vote of three (3) board members.

In any appeal procedure the board shall be represented by an attorney from the staff of the attorney general.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.12; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted the former first through third sentences, which dealt with the board’s duties of notification in cases of denials, suspensions or revocations of licenses or in case of complaints; and in the present first sentence, substituted “All disciplinary actions, denials of applications and hearings” for “The hearing”.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 33-25-113.
Fees.

The board, pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

, shall establish fees for examination, licensure or certification, licensure or certification by endorsement, renewal and reissuance.

All money shall be received and collected as provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit the money to a separate account which is subject at all times to the warrant of the state auditor, drawn upon written requisition of the president, and attested by the secretary of the board of physical therapy, with seal attached, for the payment of any expenses made by the board.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 3.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.13; Laws 1971, ch. 172, § 6; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1976, ch. 14, § 1; 1985, ch. 216, §§ 2, 3; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provision relating to payment to board members of per diem and mileage allowance, see § 33-25-103(c).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (b).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “certification, licensure or certification by endorsement” for “registration without examination, temporary licensure or registration” and substituted “reissuance” for “restoration.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-25-114.
Penalties.

Each violation of any provision of this act is a misdemeanor and is punishable by fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 131, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 33-326.14; Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “any provision of” preceding “this act” and inserted “is a misdemeanor and” preceding “is punishable.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).

§ 33-25-115.
Actions against board members; defense.

Members, agents and employees of the board and any person reporting information to the board under oath shall be immune from personal liability with respect to acts done and actions taken in good faith without fraud or malice.

The immunity provided by this section shall extend to the members of any professional review committee, investigators and witnesses appearing before the board.

The state shall defend and hold harmless any member of the board from any action at law resulting from any action taken in good faith in the course of his official duties.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 216, § 1; 2009, ch. 134, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, designated the existing language as (c) and added (a) and (b).

§ 33-25-116.
Injunctive relief; grounds.

The board may petition in its own name for an injunction to an appropriate court to enjoin:

Any person violating W.S. 33-25-102(a), unless specifically exempt from licensure or certification pursuant to W.S. 33-25-102(f);

Any license or certificate holder who is in violation of this act from practicing physical therapy;

Any person, firm, corporation, institution, association, business or other entity from employing any individual to practice physical therapy who is not licensed or certified as required by this act.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 134, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-25-101(a)(xii).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 134, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.